Utah statutes.
13-42-110.    Certificate of registration -- Timing.

(1)  The administrator shall approve or deny an initial registration as a provider within 120 days after an application is filed.  In connection with a request pursuant to Subsection 13-42-106(19) for additional information, the administrator may extend the 120-day period for not more than 60 days.  Within seven days after denying an application, the administrator, in a record, shall inform the applicant of the reasons for the denial.

(2)  If the administrator denies an application for registration as a provider or does not act on an application within the time prescribed in Subsection (1), the applicant may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(3)  Subject to Subsection 13-42-111(4) and Section 13-42-134, a registration as a provider is valid for one year.

